Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 2

Clinical Pastoral Therapy

63-22-201. Part definitions.

The following definitions shall apply in this part, unless the context clearly requires a different meaning:

“Advertise” means, but is not limited to, business solicitations, with or without limiting qualifications, in a card, sign or device issued to a person, in a sign or marking in or on any building or in any newspaper, magazine, directory or other printed matter. Advertising also includes business solicitations communicated by individual, radio, video or television broadcasting or other means designed to secure public attention;

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

“Certified clinical pastoral therapist” means a person who has met the qualifications for certified clinical pastoral therapist and holds a current, unsuspended or unrevoked certificate that has been lawfully issued by the board;

“Clinical pastoral education” means program of training designed to acquaint students of theology and practicing clergy with the clinical method of learning, increase skills in the arts of pastoral care and facilitate integration of a professional pastoral identity. Programs typically occur in general medical, psychiatric or penal institutions;

“Clinical pastoral therapy” means the diagnosis and treatment, from a clinical pastoral perspective, of the psychodynamics, interpersonal dynamics and spiritual dynamics of persons experiencing emotional behavioral or relational distress or dysfunction. Clinical pastoral therapy involves the integration and professional application of resources and techniques from the religious community's traditions of pastoral care and counsel along with recognized principles, methods and procedures of the contemporary psychotherapy community in the delivery of counseling and psychotherapeutic services to individuals, couples, families and groups;

“Licensed clinical pastoral therapist” means a person who has met the qualifications for a licensed clinical pastoral therapist and who holds a current, unsuspended or unrevoked license that has been issued lawfully by the board;

“Practice of clinical pastoral therapy” means the rendering of professional clinical pastoral therapy to individuals, couples, families or groups, either offered directly to the general public by an individual operating independently of any institution, organization or agency, through mental health clinics or agencies, whether public or private or through hospitals, whether public or private, for a fee, excluding volunteer hours;

“Recognized educational institution” means any educational institution that is accredited by a nationally or regionally recognized educational accrediting body;

“Supervision” means the direct clinical review, for the purpose of training or teaching, by a board-approved supervisor, of a clinical pastoral therapist's interaction with clients. The purpose of supervision shall be to promote the development of the practitioner's clinical skills. Supervision may include, without being limited to, the review of case presentations, audiotapes, videotapes and direct observation; and

“Use a title or description of” means to hold oneself out to the public as having a particular status by means of stating on signs, mailboxes, address plates, stationery, announcements, business cards or other instruments of professional identification.

Acts 1997, ch. 485, § 6; 2003, ch. 250, §§ 1, 12; 2016, ch. 955, § 3; 2019, ch. 233, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 485, § 6 enacted this part, effective January 1, 1998, except for the purpose of making appointments to the board, for which purpose this part took effect June 13, 1997.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted the definition of “Approved supervisor” which read, “(2) ‘Approved supervisor’ means a person who is a licensed clinical pastoral therapist and one (1) of the following:“(A) A diplomate of the American Association of Pastoral Counselors;“(B) A fellow of the American Association of Pastoral Counselors who is under the supervision of a supervisor;“(C) A diplomate of the College of Pastoral Supervision and Psychotherapy;“(D) A fellow of the College of Pastoral Supervision and Psychotherapy who is under the supervision of a supervisor; or“(E) A board-approved clinical pastoral therapy supervisor;”; deleted the definition of “Approved training program” which read, “(3) ‘Approved training program’ means a clinical training program accredited by the American Association of Pastoral Counselors or by the College of Pastoral Supervision and Psychotherapy;”; deleted the definition of “Board-approved clinical pastoral therapy supervisor” which read, “(4) ‘Board-approved clinical pastoral therapy supervisor' means a person who gives the board evidence of:“(A) Five (5) years' full-time experience in clinical pastoral therapy practice and supervision;“(B) One hundred twenty-five (125) hours of supervision specifically in the skill of providing supervision to clinical pastoral therapists; and“(C) A recommendation for board-approved supervisor status from a supervisor who had provided the supervision referred to in subdivision (4)(B);”; redesignated former (5) through (12) as present (2) through (9); and in the definition of “Supervision” substituted “board-approved supervisor” for “approved supervisor”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 233, § 6. April 30, 2019.

63-22-202. Prohibited acts by nonlicensed therapists — Penalties.

Except as specifically provided in § 63-22-204, beginning January 1, 2004, no person who is not licensed as a clinical pastoral therapist under this part shall:

Advertise that the performance of clinical pastoral therapy services is by a licensed clinical pastoral therapist; or

Use the title “licensed clinical pastoral therapist” to denote that the person is a licensed clinical pastoral therapist.

Any person who engages in any unlawful act enumerated in this section commits a Class B misdemeanor.

The department of health may institute appropriate proceedings, in law or equity, to enjoin any person from engaging in any unlawful act enumerated in this section, such action or proceeding to be brought in the circuit or chancery court of the county in which the unlawful act occurs or in which the defendant resides.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as permitting any person certified as a clinical pastoral therapist to engage in the practice of licensed psychological examiner, licensed senior psychological examiner, certified psychological assistant, licensed psychologist, or licensed social worker, as defined in the laws of this state.

Nothing in this section, except in subsection (b), applies to any person regulated by the board of nursing.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as permitting a certified clinical pastoral therapist to prescribe medications or to interpret psychological tests intended to measure and/or diagnose mental illness.

Certified clinical pastoral therapists shall establish and maintain effective working relationships with an interdisciplinary network of professionals, including at least one (1) psychologically oriented physician, usually a psychiatrist, with an unlimited license to practice the healing arts in Tennessee, in order to make provision for referral for the diagnosis and treatment of medical or mental conditions falling outside the scope of clinical pastoral therapy as defined in § 63-22-201.

Acts 1997, ch. 485, § 7; 2001, ch. 334, § 16; 2003, ch. 250, §§ 2, 3; 2008, ch. 1016, § 7.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Penalties for violation of statute, rule or order, § 63-1-134.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-22-203. Application for license — Fees — Qualifications.

An applicant for licensure as a licensed clinical pastoral therapist shall pay the board a nonrefundable fee as set by the board and shall satisfy the board that the applicant:

Is at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Is of good moral character;

Has met the educational standards set by the board, which shall include:

The completion of a course of studies consisting of a minimum of sixty (60) graduate semester hours in a curriculum approved by the board, of which a minimum of nine (9) graduate semester hours must relate specifically to the diagnosis and treatment of mental disorders, and the awarding of a master's or doctoral degree from a recognized educational institution; and

The completion of a supervised clinical experience within the academic degree program as either a practicum or internship that includes experience in the assessment, diagnosis, and treatment of the psychodynamics, interpersonal dynamics, and spiritual dynamics of persons experiencing emotional, behavioral, relational, or spiritual distress or dysfunction. The experience required under this subdivision (3)(B) must be conducted under the supervision of a board-approved supervisor;

Has provided a minimum of one thousand four hundred (1,400) hours of pastoral therapy with individuals, couples, families, or groups while receiving a minimum of two hundred seventy (270) hours of supervision of such therapy under board-approved supervision; and

Has passed examinations as approved by the board.

Acts 1997, ch. 485, § 8; 2003, ch. 250, § 4; 2016, ch. 955, § 1; 2019, ch. 233, § 3.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in the last sentence of (3)(B), substituted “under” for “by”, “must” for “shall” and “a board-approved” for “an approved”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 233, § 6. April 30, 2019.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-22-204. Exclusions from part.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as limiting the ministry, activities or services of a rabbi, priest, minister of the gospel or others authorized by a regularly organized and functioning religious body in performing the ordinary duties or functions of the clergy, nor shall anything in this chapter apply to or be construed as limiting the activities or services of Christian Science practitioners. Nor shall any rabbi, priest or minister who offers counseling services, even if fees are charged, shall be subject to the limitations of this part, as long as they do not hold themselves out as licensed pastoral therapists or licensed pastoral counselors and as long as they do not purport to provide the integration and professional application of resources and techniques from the religious community's traditions of pastoral care and counsel along with recognized principles, methods and procedures of clinical psychotherapy.

This part does not apply to a person if the person is preparing for the practice of clinical pastoral therapy under qualified supervision in a training institution or facility or supervisory arrangement recognized and approved by the board; provided, that such person is designated by such titles as “pastoral therapy intern,” “pastoral therapy trainee” or others clearly indicating such training status.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to prevent qualified members of other professional groups as defined by the board, including, but not limited to, licensed clinical social workers, licensed psychologists, licensed psychological examiners, licensed senior psychological examiners, certified psychological assistants, psychiatric nurses, physicians or attorneys at law, from performing or advertising that they provide or offer counseling services consistent with the accepted standards of their respective professions nor to prevent alcohol and drug abuse counselors licensed under § 68-24-605 or operating under qualified supervision while seeking such licensure from doing counseling consistent with the accepted standards of such profession.

Acts 1997, ch. 485, § 9; 1998, ch. 818, § 1; 2001, ch. 334, § 17; 2003, ch. 250, § 5.

63-22-205. Reciprocal agreements — License by endorsement.

The board may enter into a reciprocal agreement with any other state that licenses, certifies or registers clinical pastoral therapists, if the board finds that such state has substantially the same or higher licensure requirements than Tennessee. This agreement shall provide that the board may license without examination any resident of another state who is currently licensed, certified or registered by the state, if that resident has met the same or higher requirements as provided in this part.

The board may license by endorsement a clinical pastoral therapist applicant who is a fellow or diplomate of the American Association of Pastoral Counselors if that person otherwise meets the requirements of this chapter.

The board may also license by endorsement a clinical pastoral therapist applicant who is:

Certified as a clinical member of the American Association of Pastoral Counselors;

Can document five (5) years of full-time practice in pastoral therapy subsequent to AAPC certification; and

Otherwise meets the requirements of this chapter.

Acts 1997, ch. 485, § 10; 2003, ch. 250, §§ 6-10.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-22-206. License of certain applicants prior to January 1, 2006 — Documentation.

Until January 1, 2006, applicants who fulfill at least one (1) of the following conditions shall be entitled to receive a license as a licensed clinical pastoral therapist:

Hold current certification as a clinical pastoral therapist. Such certification must be lawfully issued by the board and not be suspended or revoked;

Document satisfaction of the requirements of § 63-22-203(1)-(4) only;

Document current active status as a fellow or diplomate of AAPC and being actively engaged in the practice of pastoral psychotherapy for at least five (5) years prior to January 1, 2003; or

Document having received a graduate theological degree from a recognized educational institution and being currently licensed in Tennessee as a psychologist designated as a health service provider, a professional counselor designated as a mental health service provider, a marital and family therapist, a clinical social worker or an alcohol and drug abuse counselor and, in addition, document being actively engaged in the practice of clinical pastoral therapy for at least five (5) years prior to January 1, 2003.

Persons who qualify for licensure as a clinical pastoral therapist pursuant to this section shall provide satisfactory proof to the board of such qualification. The board shall issue a license as a licensed clinical pastoral therapist to those persons who meet the qualifications of subsection (a) and who submit required proof of such qualifications.

Acts 1997, ch. 485, § 11; 2003, ch. 250, § 11.

63-22-207. Issuance of license.

A person who is certified as a certified clinical pastoral therapist on June 3, 2003, shall be issued a license as a licensed clinical pastoral therapist when such person's certification is renewed or upon request of such person before the expiration of such person's current certification.

Acts 2003, ch. 250, § 13.

63-22-208. Temporary license.

The board is authorized to issue a temporary license to a clinical pastoral therapist applicant who has completed the academic course work and supervised clinical experience for the license sought; provided, that in order to retain the temporary license, the applicant shall take the written examination required by the board the first time it is scheduled following issuance of the temporary license unless granted an extension by the board after submitting a written request to the board and making a showing of good cause as determined by the board. The applicant must successfully pass the exam within two (2) years following issuance of the temporary license unless the applicant receives a good cause extension by the board. An applicant may only receive one (1) good cause extension from the board.

A temporary license obtained pursuant to this section authorizes the applicant to engage in the practice of clinical pastoral therapy under the supervision of a board-approved supervisor.

In order to receive a temporary license, the applicant must submit to the board the following:

A completed application for a temporary license;

Satisfactory evidence of an agreement with a board-approved supervisor; and

All required fees.

A temporary license shall be nonrenewable and shall be valid for a period of not more than three (3) years. A temporary license may be extended beyond the three-year period at the discretion of the board if an applicant shows good cause for an extension as determined by the board. Only one (1) extension may be granted by the board for an applicant to extend the length of the applicant's temporary license. Within the period of temporary licensure, the applicant shall submit to the board an application for the regular license and shall present supporting documentation demonstrating the satisfactory completion of the required supervised clinical experience. The board shall then grant or deny the application for the regular license, based on satisfactory completion of all requirements for licensure. If the board approves or denies the application for the regular license or if the board revokes the temporary license for any reason, then the temporary license shall cease to be valid and shall be returned to the board.

The holder of a temporary license as a clinical pastoral therapist shall not represent himself or herself to be a licensed clinical pastoral therapist. The holder of a temporary license as a clinical pastoral therapist may only represent himself or herself to be a “pastoral therapy intern,” a “pastoral therapy trainee,” or such other title designation that clearly reflects trainee status and temporary licensure.

Acts 2016, ch. 955, § 2; 2019, ch. 233, §§ 4, 5.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “under the supervision of a board-approved supervisor” for “under the supervision of an approved supervisor” in (b); and substituted “a board-approved supervisor” for “an approved supervisor” in (c)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 233, § 6. April 30, 2019.